apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
  <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->
    <pardef n="/ਕੀ__prn">       
      <e><p><l>ਕੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੌਣ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕੌਣ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਦੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਦੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਦਾ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੀ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦਾ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸਨੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੇ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਸ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਿਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਕੀ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ਮੈਂ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਮੈਨੂੰ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂਨੂੰ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਥੋਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਮੈਨੂੰ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂਨੂੰ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸੀਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੇਰਾ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੇਰੇ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੇਰੀ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੇਰੀਆਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੇਰੇ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਮੈਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e> -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮੇਰ/ਾ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ਅਸੀਂ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਅਸੀਂ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਂ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਡੇ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਡਾ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਡੀ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਡੇ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਂ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਡੇ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਅਸੀਂ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਆ/ਪ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਪਣੀ</l><r>ਪ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਪਣਾ</l><r>ਪ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਪਣੇ</l><r>ਪ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਮੈਂ"><i></i><par n="/ਮੈਂ__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="ਮੇਰਾ"><i>ਮੇਰ</i><par n="ਮੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਪ"><i>ਆ</i><par n="ਆ/ਪ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਪ"><i>ਅ</i><par n="ਆ/ਪ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਸੀਂ"><i></i><par n="/ਅਸੀਂ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੀ"><i></i><par n="/ਕੀ__prn"/></e>
